Wisconsin, session 2025, AB488.
do enact as follows:AB488,13Section 1. 26.145 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB488,2,2426.145 (2m) Fire suppression products derived from soybeans. The 1purchase of a product derived from soybeans to be used as a fire suppression 2material is an eligible cost for grants under this section.AB488,2,33